Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB385.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 210.040 is amended to read as follows:
The Cabinet for Health and Family Services shall:
(1) Exercise all functions of the state in relation to the administration and operation of
the state facilities[institutions] for the care and treatment of persons with mental
illness;
(2) Establish or acquire, in accordance with the provisions of KRS 56.440 to 56.550,
other or additional facilities for psychiatric care and treatment of persons who are or
may become state charges;
(3) Cooperate with other state agencies for the development of a statewide mental
health program looking toward the prevention of mental illness and the
aftercare[post-institutional care] of persons released from public or private mental
hospitals;
(4) Provide for the custody, maintenance, care, and medical and psychiatric treatment
of the patients of the facilities[institutions] operated by the cabinet, including
emergency and other medical care required to be provided outside of the facility
while the patient is admitted to the facility. Expenses of the outside medical
provider, other than elective procedures or elective surgery, shall be paid by the
cabinet and included in the determination of the patient liability when not
covered by the patient's third-party payor;
(5) Provide psychiatric consultation for the state penal and correctional institutions, and
for the state facilities[institutions] operated for children or for persons with an
intellectual disability;
(6) Administer and supervise programs for the [noninstitutional ]care of persons with
mental illness outside of state facilities;
(7) Administer and supervise programs for the care of persons with chronic mental
Page 1 of 2
BR175600.100 - 1756 - XXXX 2/6/2026 10:08 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1756
illness, including but not limited to provision of the following:
(a) Identification of persons with chronic mental illness residing in the area to be
served;
(b) Assistance to persons with chronic mental illness in gaining access to
essential mental health services, medical and rehabilitation services,
employment, housing, and other support services designed to enable persons
with chronic mental illness to function outside inpatient facilities[institutions]
to the maximum extent of their capabilities;
(c) Establishment of community-based transitional living facilities with twenty-
four (24) hour supervision and community-based cooperative facilities with
part-time supervision; provided that, no more than either one (1) transitional
facility or one (1) cooperative facility may be established in a county
containing a city of the first class or consolidated local government with any
funds available to the cabinet;
(d) Assurance of the availability of a case manager for each person with chronic
mental illness to determine what services are needed and to be responsible for
their provision; and
(e) Coordination of the provision of mental health and related support services
with the provision of other support services to persons with chronic mental
illness;
(8) Require all providers who receive public funds through state contracts, state grants,
or reimbursement for services provided to have formalized quality assurance and
quality improvement processes, including but not limited to a grievance procedure;
and
(9) Supervise private mental hospitals receiving patients committed by order of a court.
Page 2 of 2
BR175600.100 - 1756 - XXXX 2/6/2026 10:08 AM Jacketed